California, session 20252026, AB1173.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 307.2 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:307.2. (a) There is within the legal division of the commission an ethics officer who shall be designated by the general counsel. The ethics officer shall be responsible for both of the following:(1) Instituting a program of enhanced ethics training for all commissioners and employees of the commission, including training concerning the commission’s Conflict of Interest Code, Statement of Incompatible Activities, and limitations on ex parte communications.(2) Providing confidential advice to commissioners and employees of the commission on compliance with the commission’s Conflict of Interest Code, Statement of Incompatible Activities, and limitations on ex parte communications. The ethics officer shall maintain the confidentiality of the commissioner’s or employee’s identity unless the commissioner or employee expressly indicates a desire to communicate their identity to the commission.(b) On or before July 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an online portal or email address to report ethics concerns to the commission.SEC. 2. Section 307.3 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:307.3. A staff member who moves from the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission to is employed by the commission shall not work on any matter that the staff member participated in while employed at the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission. a proceeding at the commission for which the staff member, before their employment by the commission, was listed on a formal filing for the proceeding or sponsored testimony within the proceeding.